Arkansas, session 2025, SB492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 67, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
27-67-325. Relocation of utility facility — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section and § 27-67-326:
(1) "Extraordinary event" means:
(A) An event beyond the reasonable control of a utility;
or
(B) A change of plans that causes a delay in the work of a
utility required under a relocation agreement;
*ZRC016*
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492
(2)(A) "Municipal utility system" means a utility system owned
or operated by a municipality that provides or removes at least one (1) of
the following:
(i) Electricity;
(ii) Water;
(iii) Wastewater;
(iv) Gas;
(v) Cable television; or
(vi) Broadband service.
(B) "Municipal utility system" includes without limitation
a:
(i) Consolidated waterworks system under the
Consolidated Waterworks Authorization Act, § 25-20-301 et seq.;
(ii) Utility system managed or operated by a
nonprofit corporation under § 14-199-701 et seq.; and
(iii) Utility system owned or operated by a
municipality or by a consolidated utility district under the General
Consolidated Public Utility System Improvement District Law, § 14-217-101 et
seq.;
(3)(A) “Public transportation facility” means a transportation
facility and a right-of-way that serves the public.
(B) "Public transportation facility" includes without
limitation a:
(i) Highway, interstate, freeway, street, or other
road;
(ii) Trail;
(iii) Bicycle trail; and
(iv) Sidewalk or other pedestrian facility;
(4)(A) “Relocation” means the adjustment, removal, or relocation
of a utility facility determined by the Arkansas Department of Transportation
to be necessary or appropriate in connection with the construction or
reconstruction of a public transportation facility.
(B) "Relocation" includes without limitation:
(i) Removing and reinstalling a utility facility,
including a necessary temporary utility facility;
(ii) Moving, rearranging, or changing the type of
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492
existing utility facility;
(iii) Taking necessary safety and protective
measures; and
(iv) Constructing a replacement utility facility
that is functionally equivalent to an existing utility facility and necessary
for the continuous operation of the utility service, the project economy, or
the sequence of public transportation facility construction;
(5) "Relocation agreement" means a written agreement between the
department and a utility concerning a specific relocation;
(6) "Relocation proposal" means a formal written submission
prepared by a utility in response to a request from the department concerning
a specific relocation;
(7)(A) “Utility” means a private, public, or cooperative utility
that transmits or distributes communications, including without limitation
cable service and broadband service, electricity, gas, liquids, steam, or
sewerage by means of a utility facility.
(B) "Utility" does not include a railway or railroad
engaged in interstate commerce;
(8) “Utility accommodation rules” means the rules adopted by the
State Highway Commission and administered by the department that:
(A) Address the processes and procedures for a utility to
receive reimbursement for a relocation on public transportation facilities of
the commission; and
(B) Establish the process for permits for the placement of
utility facilities on public transportation facilities of the commission; and
(9) "Utility facility" means a line, facility, or system of a
utility that is used, is available for use, or was formerly used to transmit
or distribute communications, including without limitation cable service and
broadband service, electricity, gas, liquids, steam, water, or sewerage to
the public.
(b)(1) When a utility facility located on a public transportation
facility must be removed, relocated, or adjusted to accommodate a change to a
public transportation facility, the department and the utility shall
negotiate a relocation agreement establishing the reasonable schedule for
relocation and the duties of the department and the utility concerning the
relocation.
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492
(2) When negotiating the relocation agreement under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section, the:
(A) Department shall:
(i) Provide written notice to the utility of the
need for the relocation located on the public transportation facility that
shall include:
(a) Plans that clearly identify all known
utilities that own a utility facility that is subject to relocation;
(b) The area of the public transportation
facility the department or commission intends to acquire for the project; and
(c) The proposed right-of-way acquisition and
timeline;
(ii) Provide to the utility the construction plans
for the project that demonstrate the need for the relocation;
(iii) Establish a reasonable date for the submission
of a relocation proposal;
(iv) Coordinate a relocation agreement for the work
to be performed by the utility, including a schedule for the relocation; and
(v) Issue a notice to proceed to the utility to
begin the relocation upon execution of a relocation agreement; and
(B) Utility shall:
(i) Submit to the department a relocation proposal
in accordance with the utility accommodation rules that includes without
limitation:
(a) A plan for the relocation in accordance
with the construction plans for the project provided by the department as
required under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii);
(b) A reasonable schedule for the completion
of the relocation;
(c) Reasonable cost estimates for the
relocation; and
(d) A final date all work will be complete for
the relocation;
(ii) Begin and complete the relocation within the
time frame specified in the relocation agreement negotiated under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section; and
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492
(iii) Submit a progress report every two (2) months
to the department regarding the status of the relocation after a notice to
proceed is issued under subdivision (c)(1) of this section until the
relocation is complete.
(c)(1) After a relocation agreement is executed under this section,
the department shall issue a notice to proceed with the relocation to the
owner of the utility facility that is the subject of the relocation
agreement.
(2) A notice to proceed issued under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section serves as the formal authorization for the utility to commence work
on the relocation in accordance with terms of the relocation agreement.
(d)(1) If a utility other than a municipal utility system fails to
follow the process established in the utility accommodation rules or the
relocation agreement to complete the relocation within the time period stated
in the relocation agreement, the department may assess and collect a civil
penalty from a utility other than a municipal utility system after:
(A) The department provides notice to the utility under
subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section; and
(B) The expiration of a thirty-day time period for the
utility to comply with the requirements stated in the utility accommodation
rules or the relocation agreement.
(2) The civil penalty authorized under subdivision (d)(1) of
this section shall be five hundred dollars ($500) for each business day the
utility fails to:
(A) Respond to the written notice to the utility of the
need for the relocation located on the public transportation facility
provided under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(i) of this section;
(B) Enter into negotiations for a relocation agreement
between the department and the utility; or
(C)(i) Comply with a relocation agreement to which the
utility is a party, including completing the work according to the schedule
in the relocation agreement.
(ii) A civil penalty shall not be assessed under
this subdivision (d)(2)(C) if the utility does not meet the agreed-upon
schedule but meets the final relocation completion date in the relocation
agreement.
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492
(iii) A civil penalty may be assessed under this
subdivision (d)(2)(C) if a utility fails to:
(a) Act in good faith to comply with the
relocation agreement; or
(b) Request a reasonable modification of the
schedule.
(e)(1) A civil penalty shall not be assessed under subsection (d) for
a delay that is the result of:
(A) An extraordinary event;
(B) Excavation that damages an underground utility
facility for which:
(i) The owner of the utility facility was not
provided notice of the intent to excavate; or
(ii) The utility facility was not located and marked
properly under the Arkansas Underground Facilities Damage Prevention Act, §
14-271-101 et seq.; or
(C) A delay in acquiring right-of-way after a good faith
effort by the utility to complete the acquisition of the right-of-way.
(2)(A) The department shall give a utility written notice of the
intent to assess a civil penalty under this subsection and an opportunity to
appeal the department’s decision and show cause why the civil penalty should
not be assessed.
(B) Upon a finding that a civil penalty should be assessed
under subsection (d) of this section, the department shall issue an
appropriate order to the utility.
(C) If a civil penalty has not been paid in full within
ninety (90) days after the entry of an order under subdivision (e)(3)(B) of
this section, the civil penalty may be:
(i) Deducted from the final reimbursement payment by
the department to the utility; or
(ii) Subject to a collection action.
(3) An appeal of a decision to assess a civil penalty under this
subsection (e) shall be in accordance with the utility accommodation rules
and the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(4) Moneys collected as civil penalties under this subsection
(e) shall be paid into the State Highway and Transportation Department Fund
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492
and designated for use in a utility relocation grant and loan program to be
established by the department for the purpose of providing a grant or loan to
a small utility for a relocation that is nonreimbursable.
(f)(1) If a municipal utility system fails to follow the process
established in the utility accommodation rules or the relocation agreement to
complete a relocation within the time period stated in the relocation
agreement, the department may relocate the utility facility that is the
subject of the relocation agreement.
(2) If the department relocates a utility facility under
subdivision (f)(1) of this section, the department may enter into a contract
to complete the engineering, relocation, or other work required to relocate
the utility facility of a municipal utility system after providing written
notice to the municipal utility system.
(3)(A)(i) If within ten (10) days of the receipt of written
notice from the department under subdivision (f)(2) of this section, the
municipal utility system provides the department with a list of three (3) or
more approved engineers and three (3) or more approved contractors to perform
the relocation or design specifications for the utility facility that is to
be relocated, the department shall enter into a contract only with an
engineer or contractor contained in the list to perform the relocation.
(ii) The department shall not enter into a contract
with an engineer or contractor who does not comply with the procurement
process of the department.
(B) If within ten (10) days of the receipt of written
notice from the department under subdivision (f)(2) of this section, the
municipal utility system provides the department with design specifications
for the utility facility that is to be relocated, then the department shall
require compliance with the design specifications in the contract for the
relocation.
(4) A contract entered into by the department to relocate a
utility facility of a municipal utility system under this subsection shall
identify the municipal utility system as the beneficiary of the contract.
(5) A municipal utility system that has entered into a contract
with the department to relocate a utility system of the municipal utility
system under this subsection may:
(A) Inspect the relocation of the utility facility;
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492
(B) Inspect an underground utility facility before it is
covered; and
(C) Pursue a claim against a person or entity other than
the department based on the relocation of the utility facility whether
provided under the contract with the department or by law.
(6) Within ninety (90) days of the receipt of a written invoice
from the department for the cost of a relocation under this subsection, a
municipal utility system shall:
(A) Pay to the department the non-reimbursable portion of
the cost of the relocation that the municipal utility system does not
dispute; and
(B) Enter into a dispute resolution process with the
department for any disputed portion of the invoice.
(7) If a municipal utility system fails to comply with
subdivision (f)(6) of this section, the department may offset and collect the
amount owed by the municipal utility system from any funds administered by
the department for disbursement to the municipality, including without
limitation turnback and state aid street funds that may be lawfully applied
to the relocation costs.
(g) A municipal utility system may agree to the relocation of a
utility facility of the municipal utility system by the department using the
process provided in subsection (f) of this section.
(h)(1) The department shall not act under subsection (d) or subsection
(f) of this section if an extraordinary event prevents the completion of a
relocation within the time frame specified in the relocation agreement.
(2) If an extraordinary event occurs under subdivision (h)(1) of
this section, the utility shall provide the department with a:
(A) Written notice of the extraordinary event; and
(B) Revised relocation proposal and schedule under
subdivision (b)(2)(B)(i) of this section.
(3) Upon receipt of a written notice under subdivision (h)(2) of
this section, the department shall issue a modification to the relocation
agreement reflecting a new date for the completion of the relocation as
determined by the department.
(i) The department shall promulgate rules for the implementation of
this section.
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492

27-67-326. Relocation of utility facility — Rules.
(a)(1) Utility accommodation rules adopted by the State Highway
Commission concerning relocation under § 27-67-325 shall include without
limitation the relocation coordination process between the Arkansas
Department of Transportation and the utility.
(2) Rules concerning the relocation coordination process between
the department and the utility shall include without limitation that:
(A) The department shall schedule a meeting with the owner
of the utility facility at a time mutually convenient for both parties; and
(B) Before a meeting under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section, the department shall provide the owner of the utility facility with
plans for a proposed relocation.
(3) The plans for a proposed relocation under subdivision
(a)(2)(B) of this section shall:
(A) Clearly indicate:
(i) All identified existing utilities affected by
the relocation; and
(ii) The right-of-way the department intends to
acquire for the relocation; and
(B) Use criteria that satisfy Subsurface Utility
Engineering Quality Level C or better.
(4) During a meeting under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section, the department and the owner of the utility facility shall:
(A) Identify the scope of utility facilities that will be
subject to relocation;
(B) Discuss:
(i) Proposed arrangements for the relocation,
including any right-of-way provided by the department for relocation;
(ii) The expected cost of the relocation; and
(iii) A deadline by which the owner of the utility
facility shall submit a relocation proposal to the department; and
(C) Agree upon the number of days required for the
relocation.
(5)(A) The department shall provide the utility with a written
report summarizing the decisions made and agreements reached during the
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492
meeting held under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.
(B) The report provided under subdivision (a)(5)(A) of
this section shall serve as the basis for the relocation proposal.
(b)(1) The rules promulgated by the department concerning a relocation
under § 27-67-325 shall include without limitation:
(A) The process for the creation of a relocation proposal
and relocation agreement; and
(B) The procedure for the reimbursement of the costs of a
relocation.
(2) The rules for a relocation proposal shall include without
limitation that a relocation proposal:
(A) Be provided to each party in written form;
(B) Be signed by the authorized representatives of the
department and the utility; and
(C) Include:
(i) The plan for the relocation;
(ii) The schedule for the utility to complete the
relocation;
(iii) A cost estimate for the relocation;
(iv) Deadlines for the commencement and completion
of the relocation; and
(v) The estimated cost of reimbursement by the
department for the relocation.
(3)(A) The rules for a relocation agreement shall include that a
relocation agreement may be modified if:
(i) An extraordinary event occurs; and
(ii) Either party requests a modification to the
relocation agreement.
(B) The modification of a relocation agreement shall:
(i) Be documented in writing;
(ii) Include updated timelines, costs, or other
relevant terms; and
(iii) Be approved by both parties.
(4) Rules for the reimbursement of the costs for a relocation
shall include without limitation that the:
(A) Utility owner may submit an invoice for the
04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB492
reimbursement of costs to the department upon completion of the relocation;
(B) Invoice for the reimbursement of costs for the
relocation shall reflect all costs and expenses incurred by the utility for
the relocation; and
(C) Department shall pay a complete invoice submitted
under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section within ninety (90) days of
receipt of the complete invoice by the department.

/s/J. Bryant



























04-07-2025 20:00:57 ZRC016